Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2725.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 29, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2930.07, to read: START_STATUTE36-2930.07. Prescription drugs that are not opioids; therapeutic substitutions; utilization controls A. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if a contracted licensed physician has prescribed a drug that is not an opioid to treat chronic or acute pain, a contractor may not make a therapeutic substitution for a drug that is an opioid. B. The administration may not establish more restrictive or extensive utilization controls, including more restrictive or extensive prior authorization or step therapy requirements, for clinically appropriate prescription drugs that are not opioids than the least restrictive or extensive utilization controls applicable to any clinically appropriate prescription drug that is an opioid or narcotic. END_STATUTE